es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Prendas de ropa superiores: Blusas; Bodis; Cárdigan; Tops estilo corsé; Sudaderas con capucha; Sobrecamisas; Polos; Camisas; Suéteres; Sudaderas; Camisetas de manga corta; Camisetas sin mangas; Túnicas
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > 衣類トップス: ブラウス; ボディスーツ; カーディガン; コルセットトップス; パーカー; オーバーシャツ; ポロシャツ; シャツ; セーター; スウェット; Tシャツ; タンクトップ; チュニック
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Overdele: Bluser; Bodyer; Cardigans; Korsettoppe; Hættetrøjer; Overtrøjer; Poloer; Skjorter; Sweatere; Sweatshirts; T-shirts; Tanktops; Tunikaer
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Topy: Bluzki; Body; Kardigany; Topy gorsetowe; Bluzy z kapturem; Koszule overshirt; Koszulki polo; Koszulki; Swetry; Bluzy; T-shirty; Koszulki na ramiączkach; Tuniki
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Bovenstukken kleding: Bloezen; Bodysuits; Cardigans; Korsettops; Hoody's; Overhemden; Polo's; Hemden; Truien; Sweatshirts; T-shirts; Tanktops; Tunieken
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Oblečení – topy: Blůzy; Body; Kardigany; Korzetové topy; Mikiny s kapucí; Košilové bundy; Polo trička; Košile; Svetry; Mikiny; Trička; Tílka; Tuniky
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Loại áo: Áo cánh; Áo liền quần; Áo khoác len; Áo kiểu corset; Áo có mũ; Áo khoác sơ mi; Áo thun cổ bẻ; Áo sơ mi; Áo len dài tay; Áo nỉ; Áo thun; Áo ba lỗ; Áo chùm hông
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Bekleidungsoberteile: Blusen; Bodys; Strickjacken; Korsett-Tops; Kapuzenpullis; Überhemden; Polos; Shirts; Pullover; Sweatshirts; T-Shirts; Tanktops; Tuniken
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Кофты и футболки: Блузки; Боди; Кардиганы; Топы-корсеты; Худи; Рубашки-куртки; Поло; Рубашки; Свитеры; Толстовки; Футболки; Майки; Туники
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Τοπ μπλουζάκια: Μπλούζες; Κορμάκια; Ζακέτες; Τοπ κορσέδες; Φούτερ με κουκούλα; Εξωτερικά πουκάμισα; Πόλο; Πουκάμισα; Πουλόβερ; Φούτερ; Κοντομάνικα μπλουζάκια; Μπλούζες χωρίς μανίκια; Τούνικ
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Yläosan vaatteet: Paitapuserot; Bodyt; Neuletakit; Korsettitopit; Hupparit; Päällyspaidat; Poolot; Paidat; Neulepuserot; Collegepuserot; T-paidat; Tankkitopit; Tunikat
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Ruházati felsők: Blúzok; Body-k; Kardigánok; Fűzős felsők; Kapucnis pulóverek; Hosszabbított pólók; Galléros pólók; Ingek; Pulóverek; Melegítő felsők; Pólók; Ujjatlan felsők; Tunikák
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Topuri: Bluze; Costume de baie întregi; Cardigane; Topuri cu corset; Hanorace; Cămăși oversize; Tricouri polo; Cămăși; Pulovere; Bluze sport; Tricouri; Maiouri; Tunici
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 服装上衣: 女式衬衫; 连体衣; 开衫; 紧身胸衣式上衣; 连帽衫; 外套式衬衫; 保罗衫; 衬衫; 毛衣; 卫衣; T 恤; 无袖衫; 束腰外衣
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Gornji dijelovi odjeće: Bluze; Bodiji; Kardigani; Gornji dijelovi korzeta; Majice s kapuljačom; Gornje majice; Polo majice; Košulje; Džemperi; Gornji dio trenirke; Majice kratkih rukava; Majice bez rukava; Tunike
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > เสื้อ: เสื้อเบลาส์; บอดี้สูท; เสื้อคาร์ดิแกน; เสื้อคอร์เซ็ต; เสื้อฮู้ด; เสื้อเชิ้ตตัวนอก; เสื้อโปโล; เสื้อเชิ้ต; เสื้อสเวตเตอร์; เสื้อแขนยาว; เสื้อยืด; เสื้อกล้าม; เสื้อคลุม
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 上身服飾: 束腰上衣; 連身衣; 開襟毛衣; 馬甲上衣; 連帽上衣; 外套式襯衫; Polo 衫; 襯衫; 毛衣; 運動衫; T 恤; 無袖背心; 束腰衫
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Hauts de vêtements: Chemisiers; Bodies; Cardigans; Tops corsets; Sweats à capuche; Surchemises; Polos; Chemises; Pulls; Sweat-shirts; T-shirts; Débardeurs; Tuniques
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Viršutinės dalies drabužiai: Palaidinės; Bodžiukai; Kardiganai; Korsetinės palaidinės; Megztiniai su gobtuvu; Palaidiniai; Polo marškinėliai; Marškiniai; Sviteriai; Megztiniai; Marškinėliai; Berankoviai marškinėliai; Tunikos
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Blusas e regatas: Blusas; Macacões; Cardigãs; Tops corset; Moletons com capuz; Sobrecamisas; Polos; Camisas; Suéteres; Moletons; Camisetas; Regatas; Túnicas
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Överdelar: Blusar; Body; Koftor; Korsett-toppar; Hoodies; Övertröjor; Tenniströjor; Skjortor; Tröjor; Collegetröjor; T-shirts; Linnen; Tunikor
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 의류 상의: 블라우스; 바디수트; 카디건; 코르셋 탑; 후드티; 오버셔츠; 폴로; 셔츠; 스웨터; 스웻셔츠; 티셔츠; 탱크탑; 튜닉
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Zgornji deli oblačil: Bluze; Bodiji; Jopice; Zgornji del korzeta; Puloverji s kapuco; Srajčne jakne; Polo majice; Srajce; Puloverji; Majice z dolgimi rokavi; Kratke majice; Majice brez rokavov; Tunike
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Tops: Blusas; Bodies; Casacos de malha; Tops espartilho; Camisolas com capuz; Sobrecamisas; Pólos; Camisas; Camisolas; Sweatshirts; T-shirts; Camisolas de manga cava; Túnicas
en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Clothing Tops: Blouses; Bodysuits; Cardigans; Corset Tops; Hoodies; Overshirts; Polos; Shirts; Sweaters; Sweatshirts; T-Shirts; Tank Tops; Tunics
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Klestopper: Bluser; Bodysuits; Kardiganer; Korsettoverdeler; Hettegensere; Overskjorter; Poloskjorter; Skjorter; Gensere; Sweatshirts; T-skjorter; Singleter; Tunikaer
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Indumenti superiori: Camicette; Body; Cardigan; Top a corsetto; Felpe con cappuccio; Overshirt; Polo; Magliette; Maglioni; Felpe; T-shirt; Canotte; Tuniche
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Giysi Üstleri: Bluzlar; Bodysuit; Hırka; Korse üstler; Kapüşonlular; Overshirt; Pololar; Gömlekler; Kazak; Sweatshirt; Tişörtler; Tank Top; Tunikler
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Topy: Blúzky; Body; Kardigány; Korzetové vrchné diely; Mikiny s kapucňou; Košeľové bundy; Polokošele; Košele; Svetre; Mikiny; Tričká; Tielka; Tuniky
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Горни дрехи: Блузи; Бодита; Жилетки; Блузи тип „корсет“; Суетшърти с качулка; Връхни ризи; Поло блузи; Ризи; Пуловери; Суетшърти без качулка; Тениски; Потници; Туники